Utah statutes.
76-5-303.5.   Notification of conviction of custodial interference.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Convicted" means that a person has received a conviction.
(b)  "Conviction" is as defined in Section 53-3-102.
(2)  If a person is convicted of custodial interference under Section
76-5-303, the court shall notify the Driver License Division, created in
Section 53-3-103, of the conviction, and whether the conviction is for:
(a)  a class B misdemeanor, under Subsection 76-5-303(3);
(b)  a class A misdemeanor, under Subsection 76-5-303(4); or
(c)  a felony, under Subsection 76-5-303(5).
